Mississippi, session 2026, HB1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The State Board of Health may promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards for a statewide Obstetrics System of Care ("OB SOC").  The board shall comply with Section 25-43-1.101 et seq., in promulgating such rules and regulations.  Such rules and regulations shall be effective on or after July 1, 2027. (2)  The State Department of Health shall be designated as the lead agency for OB SOC development, implementation and management. (3)  The levels of care shall accurately reflect the current capacities and constraints of each hospital and facility system.  The department shall recognize and consider differences in size, resources, patient population, geographies served, and available specialties, ensuring that the designated level of care aligns with what each system can reliably provide on an ongoing basis. (4)  The rules and regulations governing care shall be structured to accommodate the appropriate scopes of practice for all licensed professionals within the health system. This includes clearly delineating what tasks, procedures, and decision-making authority are appropriate for each health care professional at each level of care, while maintaining patient safety and standards of quality, and considering whether hospitals and health systems have the capacity to staff such professionals at a given level of care.  The board shall not promulgate a rule or regulation that expands upon or narrows a health care professional's lawful scope of practice under state statute. (5)  The department shall develop and implement the Mississippi OB SOC Plan and OB SOC standards, which include, but are not limited to, maternal center and neonatal center designation, field triage of OB patients, inter-facility transfer of OB patients, OB care from initial medical contact through appropriate intervention, OB data collection, OB system evaluation and management of OB funding.  The board shall further promulgate specific regulations regarding the methods and procedures by which Mississippi licensed acute care facilities shall participate in the statewide OB SOC.  These specific regulations shall include mechanisms for determining the appropriate level of participation for each facility or class of facilities.  In promulgating the rules and regulations pursuant to this act, the board shall consult with the appropriate representatives from facilities in each proposed level of care, along with relevant health professionals and other appropriate experts, and shall consider the input obtained in the development and implementation of such rules and regulations. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.